Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Required School Disciplinary and Safety Program.

Sec. 14.33.110.
Purpose of school disciplinary and safety program.

The purpose of AS

14.33.110

—

14.33.140

is to

implement and maintain community-based standards of school behavior that are developed by students, parents, teachers, school administrators, and the community;

facilitate the creation of a standard of school behavior and safety by local communities for the schools in those communities;

protect and support teachers who enforce standards of student behavior and safety in the classroom established under AS

14.33.120

; and

ensure that all schools and school districts receiving state funds, that may not have already done so, implement and maintain an effective school disciplinary and safety program.

History.

(§ 2 ch 114 SLA 2000)

Sec. 14.33.120.
School disciplinary and safety program.

Each governing body shall adopt a written school disciplinary and safety program. The program required under this subsection must be made available to students, parents, legal guardians, and the public and include written

standards for student behavior and safety that reflect community standards and that include, at a minimum, basic requirements for respect and honesty; standards required under this paragraph must be developed and periodically reviewed with the collaboration of members of each school, parents, legal guardians, teachers, and other persons responsible for the students at a school; a governing body may require that standards developed under this paragraph be consistent for all schools in an attendance area or the district;

standards relating to when a teacher is authorized to remove a student from the classroom for

failure to follow student behavior and safety standards; or

behavior described under AS

14.30.045

(1) or (2);

procedures for notifying teachers of dangerous students consistent with AS

47.12.310(b)

;

standards relating to when a teacher, teacher’s assistant, or other person responsible for students is authorized to use reasonable and appropriate force to maintain classroom safety and discipline as described under AS

11.81.430(a)(2)

;

policies necessary to comply with provisions of state and federal law, including 20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1482 (Individuals with Disabilities Education Act);

standards to address needs of students for whom mental health or substance abuse may be a contributing factor to noncompliance with the school disciplinary and safety program;

policies for implementing a student conflict resolution strategy, including the nonviolent resolution or mediation of conflicts and procedures for reporting and resolving conflicts;

procedures for periodic review and revision of the school disciplinary and safety program;

policies and procedures consistent with standards for use of restraint and seclusion of students as described in AS

14.33.125

.

A school shall, on the same day as the incident, provide to the parent or legal guardian of an affected student information relating to an incident involving disruptive or violent behavior by the student that resulted in restraint or seclusion of the student by school personnel.

History.

(§ 2 ch 114 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 2001; am § 27 ch 40 SLA 2008; am §§ 1, 2 ch 95 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For local education, see 4 AAC 5.

For safe schools, see 4 AAC 6, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1482” for “20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1485” in paragraph (a)(5).

The 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, in (a), in the introductory language, inserted “be made available to students, parents, legal guardians, and the public and” following “under this subsection must”, in (a)(1), inserted “legal guardians,” following “parents,”, added (a)(9); rewrote (b), which read, “A school district shall report information relating to school district disciplinary and safety programs as required by the department, including incidents of disruptive or violent behavior.”

Sec. 14.33.125.
Student restraint or seclusion; limitations.

A public school disciplinary and safety program must

prohibit restraint or seclusion of a student except as provided in (b) of this section;

be annually reviewed with school personnel;

include a written report of each incident that is maintained in the student’s record as described in (d) of this section; and

include a review of each incident in which restraint or seclusion is used as provided in (e) of this section.

A teacher, teacher’s assistant, or other person responsible for students may physically restrain or seclude a student only if

the student’s behavior poses an imminent danger of physical injury to the student or another person;

less restrictive interventions would be ineffective to stop the imminent danger to the student or another person;

the person continuously monitors the student in face-to-face contact or, if face-to-face contact is unsafe, by continuous direct visual contact with the student;

the person has received training in crisis intervention and de-escalation and restraint techniques that has been approved by the department under AS

14.33.127

, unless a trained person is not immediately available and the circumstances are rare and present an unavoidable and unforeseen emergency; and

the restraint or seclusion is discontinued immediately when the student no longer poses an imminent danger of physical injury to the student or another person or when a less restrictive intervention is effective to stop the danger of physical injury.

A teacher, teacher’s assistant, or other person responsible for students may not

use chemical restraint;

use mechanical restraint; or

physically restrain a student by placing the student on the student’s back or stomach or in a manner that restricts the student’s breathing.

School personnel who restrain or seclude a student shall provide a written report of the incident to the school administrator. A school shall provide a copy of the report to the student’s parents or legal guardians. The report must include

the date and time of the incident;

the names and job titles of school personnel who participated in or supervised the incident;

a description of the activity that preceded the incident, including efforts and strategies used with the student before the incident;

a description of the incident, including the type and duration of the intervention used;

a description of how the incident ended, including any further action taken.

A school district shall ensure that a review process is established and conducted for each incident that involves restraint or seclusion of a student. The review must be conducted as soon as practicable after the event and include

staff review of the incident;

follow-up communication with the student and the student’s parent or legal guardian;

review of and recommendations for adjusting or amending procedures, strategies, accommodations, individualized education plans, or other student behavior plans, or for additional staff training.

Each school district shall annually report to the department, on a form acceptable to the department, the total number of incidents involving the restraint or seclusion of a student. The report must specify

the number of incidents that resulted in injury or death of students or personnel;

the number of incidents in which school personnel involved in the restraint or seclusion were not trained in an approved crisis intervention training program as described in AS

14.33.127(b)

; and

the number of incidents involving the restraint or seclusion of a child with a disability under AS

14.30.350

; the report must also include the category of the disability of the child involved in each incident.

In this section,

“chemical restraint” means a psychopharmacologic drug that is used on a student for discipline or convenience and that is not required to treat a medical symptom;

“mechanical restraint” means the use of a device that is not a medical device or protective equipment prescribed by a qualified health care professional to restrict a student’s freedom of movement;

“physically restrain” or “physical restraint” means a personal restriction that immobilizes or reduces the ability of a student to move the student’s arms, legs, or head freely;

“restraint” means physical restraint, chemical restraint, mechanical restraint, or other aversive behavioral interventions that compromise health and safety;

“seclusion” means the involuntary confinement of a student alone in a room or area that the student is physically prevented from leaving; “seclusion” does not include a classroom time-out, supervised detention, or suspension from school under AS

14.30.045

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 95 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 95, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on October 14, 2014.

Sec. 14.33.127.
Crisis intervention training.

The department shall approve crisis intervention training programs for schools, which shall include training in

evidence-based techniques that have been shown to be effective in the prevention of restraint and seclusion of students;

evidence-based techniques shown to be effective in keeping school personnel and students safe when imposing physical restraint or seclusion of students;

evidence-based skills related to positive behavior supports, conflict prevention, understanding antecedents, de-escalation, and conflict management;

first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and

applicable policies and procedures.

The governing body of a school shall ensure that a sufficient number of school employees receives periodic training in an approved crisis intervention program to meet the needs of the school population.

In this section,

“restraint” has the meaning given in AS

14.33.125

;

“seclusion” has the meaning given in AS

14.33.125

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 95 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 95, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on October 14, 2014.

Sec. 14.33.130.
Enforcement of approved program; additional safety obligations.

A teacher, a teacher’s assistant, a principal, or another person responsible for students may not be terminated or otherwise subjected to formal disciplinary action for lawful enforcement of an approved school disciplinary and safety program, including behavior standards, adopted under AS

14.33.120

.

A teacher, a teacher’s assistant, a principal, or another person responsible for students who

receives information about a student under AS

47.12.310(b)

or receives information that may affect the safety of students or staff shall notify the student’s teacher or a school administrator; and

in the course of employment, observes a student committing a crime shall report the crime to the local law enforcement agency; in this paragraph, “crime” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 114 SLA 2000)

Sec. 14.33.140.
Civil liability for enforcing disciplinary and safety program.

A teacher, a teacher’s assistant, a principal, or another person responsible for students is not liable for civil damage resulting from an act or omission (1) arising out of enforcement of an approved school disciplinary and safety program adopted under AS

14.33.120

; and (2) arising out of and in the course of employment unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 2 ch 114 SLA 2000)